Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.352

Voluntary waiver of firearm rights—Form—Availability.

(1) The administrator for the courts, under the direction of the chief justice, shall develop a voluntary waiver of firearm rights form and a revocation of voluntary waiver of firearm rights form by January 1, 2019.

(2) The forms must include all of the information necessary for identification and entry of the person into the national instant criminal background check system, and any other federal or state computer-based systems used by law enforcement agencies or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms. The voluntary waiver of firearm rights form must include the following language:

Because you have filed this voluntary waiver of firearm rights, effective immediately you may not purchase, receive, control, or possess any firearm. You may revoke this voluntary waiver of firearm rights any time after at least seven calendar days have elapsed since the time of filing.

(3) The forms must be made available on the administrator for the courts website, at all county clerk offices, and must also be made widely available at firearm and ammunition dealers and health care provider locations.

[ 2023 c 262 s 4; 2018 c 145 s 2.]